Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-126] Insubordinate conduct toward
warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer. Any warrant
officer or enlisted member who:

(1) Strikes or assaults a warrant officer,
noncommissioned officer or petty officer, while that officer is in the
execution of the officer's office;

(2) Wilfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant
officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer; or

(3) Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in
language or deportment toward a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or
petty officer, while that officer is in the execution of the officer's office;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next